Texas, session 892, HB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 38, Utilities Code, is amended by adding Subchapter G to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER G. VEGETATION MANAGEMENT AND DEBRIS REMOVAL Sec. 38.251.  DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter: (1)  "First tier coastal county" has the meaning assigned by Section 2210.003, Insurance Code. (2)  "Vegetation management" includes the trimming, removal, relocation, or prevention of growth of trees, shrubs, or other vegetation located inside or outside of a right-of-way or an easement. Sec. 38.252.  EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN REQUIREMENTS. An electric utility that serves a portion of a first tier coastal county or that is determined by the commission to serve an area of this state with high flood risk shall include in the utility's emergency operations plan: (1)  a vegetation management plan for the utility's transmission and distribution system; and (2)  processes for the removal of debris from a right-of-way or easement used by the utility after a natural disaster. Sec. 38.253.  VEGETATION MANAGEMENT PLAN. (a) A vegetation management plan required by Section 38.252(1) must: (1)  explain the processes for implementing the plan; (2)  detail the number of miles expected to be trimmed on the electric utility's transmission and distribution system; and (3)  include the estimated costs of implementing the plan by year. (b)  The commission shall review a vegetation management plan required by Section 38.252(1) and issue an order to approve, modify, or deny the plan not later than the 180th day after the date the plan is filed with the commission. The commission may approve the plan only if the commission determines that approving the plan is in the public interest. (c)  A proceeding under this section is not a rate proceeding under Chapter 36. (d)  An electric utility may conduct vegetation management that exceeds the amount of vegetation management authorized in the utility's approved vegetation management plan and request recovery of those excess vegetation management costs under Section 38.254(b). Sec. 38.254.  VEGETATION MANAGEMENT PLAN COST RECOVERY. (a) An electric utility may recover vegetation management plan costs for the utility's distribution system through a vegetation management cost recovery factor if reviewed and approved in the plan proceeding under Section 38.253. For purposes of the vegetation management cost recovery factor, the electric utility shall: (1)  establish the distribution system vegetation management plan costs the utility seeks to collect in the proposed factor; (2)  ensure that distribution system vegetation management plan costs that are being recovered through the utility's approved base rates are not included in the proposed factor; (3)  propose an allocation of distribution system vegetation management costs among rate classes consistent with the manner in which costs of that kind were allocated in accordance with the utility's most recent comprehensive base rate proceeding; and (4)  exclude any costs for distribution system vegetation management included in a resiliency plan approved by the commission under Section 38.079. (b)  An electric utility shall annually submit for the commission's approval a proposed adjustment to the utility's vegetation management cost recovery factor. The proposed adjustment must: (1)  reflect any increase or decrease in projected estimated annual costs that were included in an approved vegetation management plan or previous distribution system vegetation management cost recovery factor; (2)  reflect any over-collected or under-collected actual costs from the preceding year, including carrying costs at the weighted average cost of capital approved by the commission in the electric utility's most recent comprehensive base rate proceeding; (3)  be accompanied by a report that summarizes the utility's actual distribution system vegetation management costs for the preceding year; and (4)  exclude any costs for distribution system vegetation management included in a resiliency plan approved by the commission under Section 38.079. (c)  The commission may not hold a hearing on the adjustment of a vegetation management cost recovery factor under Subsection (b). The commission shall review an electric utility's actual distribution system vegetation management costs for the preceding year to determine the appropriate adjustment. An interested party, including the office, may provide to the commission comments on whether the factor reasonably reflects the annual costs associated with the electric utility's distribution system vegetation management plan and any over-collected or under-collected amounts from the preceding year. (d)  The commission shall issue an order on a proposed adjustment of a vegetation management cost recovery factor under Subsection (b) not later than the 90th day after the date the proposed adjustment is filed with the commission. (e)  An electric utility may defer for future recovery as a regulatory asset all or a portion of the vegetation management plan costs for the utility's transmission system that are not being recovered through the utility's approved base rates, including carrying costs at the utility's weighted average cost of capital established in the commission's final order in the utility's most recent base rate proceeding, and use commission-authorized cost recovery alternatives or another general rate proceeding. (f)  A proceeding under this section is not a rate proceeding under Chapter 36. Sec. 38.255.  RECOVERY OF CERTAIN DEBRIS REMOVAL COSTS. An electric utility described by Section 38.252 that incurs costs to remove debris caused by a natural disaster may defer all or a portion of the costs that are not being recovered through the utility's approved base rates for future recovery as a regulatory asset, including carrying costs at the utility's weighted average cost of capital established in the commission's final order in the utility's most recent base rate proceeding and use commission-authorized cost recovery alternatives or another general rate proceeding. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.